North Carolina statutes. Chapter 139. Soil and Water Conservation Districts.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 139-5.
Creation of soil and water conservation districts.

Any 25 occupiers of land lying within the limits of the territory proposed to be organized into a district may file a petition with the Soil and Water Conservation Commission asking that a soil and water conservation district be organized to function in the territory described in the petition. Such petition shall set forth:

The proposed name of said district.

That there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare, for a soil and water conservation district to function in the territory described in the petition.

A description of the territory proposed to be organized as a district, which description shall not be required to be given by metes and bounds or by legal subdivisions, but shall be deemed sufficient if generally accurate.

A request that the Soil and Water Conservation Commission duly define the boundaries for such districts; that a referendum be held within the territory so defined on the question of the creation of a soil and water conservation district in such territory; and that the Commission determine that such a district be created.Where more than one petition is filed covering parts of the same territory, the Soil and Water Conservation Commission may consolidate all or any such petitions.Town or village lots or government-owned or controlled lands may be included within the boundaries of any district. As used in this subsection: The term “government-owned or controlled land” includes land owned or controlled by any governmental agency or subdivision, federal, State or local; and the term “town and village lots” means parcels or tracts on which no agricultural operations are conducted, or (being less than three acres in extent) whose production of agricultural products for home use or for sale during the immediately preceding calendar year was of less than two hundred and fifty dollars ($250.00) in value. This section applies to existing soil and water conservation districts as well as districts that may hereafter be formed. Insofar as it applies to existing districts it is intended to be declaratory of the present boundaries of such districts as defined by other charters.

Within 30 days after such a petition has been filed with the Soil and Water Conservation Commission, it shall cause due notice to be given of a proposed hearing upon the question of the desirability and necessity, in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare, of the creation of such districts, upon the question of the appropriate boundaries to be assigned to such district, upon the propriety of the petition and other proceedings taken under this Chapter, and upon all questions relevant to such inquiries. All occupiers of land within the limits of the territory described in the petition, and of lands within any territory considered for addition to such described territory, and all other interested parties, shall have the right to attend such hearings and to be heard. If it shall appear upon the hearing that it may be desirable to include within the proposed district territory outside the area within which due notice of the hearing has been given, the hearing shall be adjourned and due notice of further hearing shall be given throughout the entire area considered for the inclusion of the district, and such further hearing held. After such hearing, if the Commission shall determine, upon the facts presented at such hearing and upon such other relevant facts and information as may be available, that there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare, for a soil and water conservation district to function in the territory considered at the hearing, it shall make and record such determination, and shall define, by metes and bounds or by legal subdivisions, the boundaries of such district. In making such determination and in defining such boundaries, the Commission shall give due weight and consideration to the topography or the area considered and of the state and composition of soils therein, the distribution of erosion, the prevailing land-use practices, the desirability and necessity of including within the boundaries the particular lands under consideration and the benefits such lands may receive from being included within such boundaries, the relation of the proposed area to existing watersheds and agricultural regions, and to other soil and water conservation districts already organized or proposed for organization under the provisions of this Chapter, and such other physical, geographical and economic factors as are relevant, having due regard to the legislative determination set forth in

G.S. 139-2

. The territory to be included within such boundaries need not be contiguous. If the Commission shall determine after such hearing after due consideration of the said relevant facts, that there is no need for a soil and water conservation district to function in the territory considered at the hearing, it shall make and record such determination and shall deny the petition. After six months shall have expired from the date of the denial of any such petition, subsequent petitions covering the same or substantially the same territory may be filed as aforesaid and new hearings held and determinations made thereon.

After the Commission has made and recorded a determination that there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare for the organization of a district in a particular territory and has defined the boundaries thereof, it shall consider the question whether the operation of a district within such boundaries with the powers conferred upon soil and water conservation districts in this Chapter is administratively practicable and feasible. To assist the Commission in the determination of such administrative practicability and feasibility, it shall be the duty of the Commission, within a reasonable time after entry of the finding that there is need for the organization of the proposed district and the determination of the boundaries thereof, to hold a referendum within the proposed district upon the proposition of the creation of the district, and to cause due notice of such referendum to be given. The question shall be submitted by ballots upon which the words “For creation of a soil and water conservation district of the lands below described and lying in the county(ies) of _______________ , _______________ and _______________ .” and “Against creation of a soil and water conservation district of the lands below described and lying in the county(ies) of _______________ and _______________ .” shall appear with a square before each proposition and a direction to insert an X mark in the square before one or the other of said propositions as the voter may favor or oppose creation of such district. The ballot shall set forth the boundaries of such proposed district as determined by the Commission. All occupiers of land lying within the boundaries of the territory, as determined by the Soil and Water Conservation Commission, shall be eligible to vote in such referendum. Only such land occupiers shall be eligible to vote.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall pay all expenses for the issuance of such notices and the conduct of such hearings and referenda, and shall supervise the conduct of such hearings and referenda. It shall issue appropriate regulations governing the conduct of such hearings and referenda, and providing for the registration prior to the date of the referendum of all eligible voters, or prescribing some other appropriate procedure for the determination of those eligible as voters in such referendum. No informality in the conduct of such referendum or in any matters relating thereto shall invalidate said referendum or the result thereof if notice thereof shall have been given substantially as herein provided and said referendum shall have been fairly conducted.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall publish the results of such referendum and shall thereafter consider and determine whether the operation of the district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible. If the Commission shall determine that the operation of such district is not administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record such determination and deny the petition. If the Commission shall determine that the operation of such district is administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record such in the manner hereinafter provided. In making such determination the Commission shall give due regard and weight to the attitudes of the occupiers of lands lying within the defined boundaries, the number of land occupiers eligible to vote in such referendum who shall have voted, the proportion of the votes cast in such referendum in favor of the creation of the district to the total number of votes cast, the approximate wealth and income of the land occupiers of the proposed district, the probable expense of carrying on erosion control operations within such district, and such other economic and social factors as may be relevant to such determination, having due regard to the legislative determination set forth in

G.S. 139-2

: Provided, however, that the Commission shall not have authority to determine that the operations of the proposed district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible unless at least a majority of the votes cast in the referendum upon the proposition of creation of the district shall have been cast in favor of the creation of such district.

If the Commission shall determine that the operation of the proposed district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible, it shall appoint two temporary supervisors to act as the governing body of the district, who shall serve until supervisors are elected or appointed and qualify as provided in

G.S. 139-6

and 139-7. Such district shall be a governmental subdivision of this State and a public body corporate and politic, upon the taking of the following proceedings:The two appointed temporary supervisors shall present to the Secretary of State an application signed by them which shall set forth (and such application need contain no detail other than the mere recitals):

That a petition for the creation of the district was filed with the Soil and Water Conservation Commission pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter and that the proceedings specified in this Chapter were taken pursuant to such petition; that the application is being filed in order to complete the organization of the district as a governmental subdivision and public body, corporate and politic under this Chapter; and that the Commission has appointed them as supervisors;

The name and official residence of each of the temporary supervisors, together with a certified copy of the appointment evidencing their right to office;

The name which is proposed for the district; and

The location of the principal office of the supervisors of the district.The application shall be subscribed and sworn to by each of the said temporary supervisors before an officer authorized by the laws of this State to take and certify oaths, who shall certify upon the application that he personally knows the temporary supervisors and knows them to be the officers as affirmed in the application, and that each has subscribed thereto in the officer’s presence. The application shall be accompanied by a statement by the Soil and Water Conservation Commission, which shall certify (and such statement need contain no detail other than the mere recitals) that a petition was filed, notice issued, and hearing held as aforesaid, that the Commission did duly determine that there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare, for a soil and water conservation district to function in the proposed territory and did define the boundaries thereof; that notice was given and a referendum held on the question of the creation of such district, and that the result of such referendum showed a majority of the votes cast in such referendum to be in favor of the creation of the district; that thereafter the Commission did duly determine that the operation of the proposed district is administratively practicable and feasible. The said statement shall set forth the boundaries of the district as they have been defined by the Commission.The Secretary of State shall examine the application and statement and, if he finds that the name proposed for the district is not identical with that of any other soil and water conservation district of this State or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion or uncertainty, he shall receive and file them and shall record them in an appropriate book of record in his office. If the Secretary of State shall find that the name proposed for the district is identical with that of any other soil and water conservation district of this State, or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, he shall certify such fact to the Soil and Water Conservation Commission, which shall thereupon submit to the Secretary of State a new name for the said district, which shall not be subject to such defects. Upon receipt of such new name, free of such defects, the Secretary of State shall record the application and statement, with the name so modified, in an appropriate book of record in his office. When the application and statement have been made, filed and recorded, as herein provided, the district shall constitute a governmental subdivision of this State and a public body corporate and politic. The Secretary of State shall make and issue to the said supervisors a certificate, under the seal of the State, of the due organization of the said district, and shall record such certificate with the application and statement. The boundaries of such district shall include the territory as determined by the Soil and Water Conservation Commission as aforesaid, but in no event shall they include any area included within the boundaries of another soil and water conservation district organized under the provisions of this Chapter.

After six months shall have expired from the date of entry of a determination by the Soil and Water Conservation Commission that operation of a proposed district is not administratively practicable and feasible, and denial of a petition pursuant to such determination, subsequent petitions may be filed as aforesaid, and action taken thereon in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter.

Petitions for including additional territory within an existing district may be filed with the Soil and Water Conservation Commission, and the proceedings herein provided for in the case of petitions to organize a district shall be observed in the case of petitions for such inclusions. The Commission shall prescribe the form for such petitions, which shall be as nearly as may be in the form prescribed in this Chapter for petitions to organize a district. Where the total number of land occupiers in the area proposed for inclusion shall be less than 25, the petition may be filed when signed by two thirds of the occupiers of such area, and in such case no referendum need be held. In referenda petitions for such inclusion, all occupiers of land lying within the proposed additional area shall be eligible to vote.

In any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to any contract, proceeding or action of the district, the district shall be deemed to have been established in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter upon proof of the issuance of the aforesaid certificate by the Secretary of State. A copy of such certificate duly certified by the Secretary of State shall be admissible in evidence in any such suit, action, or proceeding and shall be proof of the filing and contents thereof.

History.

1937, c. 393, s. 5; 1947, c. 131, s. 4; 1959, c. 781, s. 6; 1965, c. 582, s. 3; 1973, c. 1262, s. 38; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(91); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2011-145, s. 13.22A(k), (l).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.22A(k), (
l
), effective July 1, 2011, in the first sentence of subsections (d) and (e), substituted “Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources.”

§ 139-6.
District board of supervisors — elective members; certain duties.

After the issuance of the certificate of organization of the soil and water conservation district by the Secretary of State, an election shall be held in each county of the district to elect the members of the soil and water conservation district board of supervisors as herein provided.

The district board of supervisors shall consist of three elective members to be elected in each county of the district, and that number of appointive members as provided in

G.S. 139-7

. Upon the creation of a district, the first election of the members shall be held at the next succeeding election for county officers.

All elections for members of the district board of supervisors shall be held at the same time as the regular election for county officers beginning in November 1974. The election shall be nonpartisan and no primary election shall be held. The election shall be held and conducted by the county board of elections.

Candidates shall file their notice of candidacy on forms prescribed by the county board of elections. The notice of candidacy must be filed no earlier than noon on the second Monday in June and no later than noon on the first Friday in July preceding the election. The candidate shall pay a filing fee of five dollars ($5.00) at the time of filing the notice of candidacy.

Beginning with the election to be held in November 1974, the two candidates receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected for a term of four years, and the candidate receiving the next highest number of votes shall be elected for a term of two years; thereafter, as their terms expire, their successors shall be elected for terms of four years. If the position of district supervisor is not filled by failure to elect, then the office shall be deemed vacant upon the expiration of the term of the incumbent, and the office shall be filled as provided in

G.S. 139-7

.

The persons elected in 1974 and thereafter shall take office on the first Monday in December following their election.

The terms of the present members of the soil and water conservation districts, both elective and appointive members, are hereby extended to or terminated on the first Monday in December 1974.

All qualified voters of the district shall be eligible to vote in the election. Except as provided in this Chapter, the election shall be held in accordance with the applicable provisions of Articles 23 and 24 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.

The district board of supervisors, after the appointment of the appointive members has been made, shall select from its members a chairman, a vice-chairman and a secretary. It shall be the duty of the district board of supervisors to perform those powers, duties, and authority conferred upon supervisors under this Chapter; to develop annual county and district goals and plans for soil conservation work therein; to request agencies, whose duties are such as to render assistance in soil and water conservation, to set forth in writing what assistance they may have available in the county and district.

History.

1937, c. 393, s. 6; 1947, c. 131, s. 5; 1949, c. 268, s. 1; 1957, c. 1374, s. 2; 1963, c. 815; 1973, c. 502, s. 1; 1975, c. 798, s. 4; 1979, c. 519, s. 1; 1981, c. 560, s. 3; 2002-159, s. 55(h); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “Article 27 of Chapter 163A” for “Articles 23 and 24 of Chapter 163” in the next to the last undesignated paragraph.

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to the references in this section.

§ 139-7.
District board of supervisors — appointive members; organization of board; certain powers and duties.

The governing body of a soil and water conservation district shall consist of the three elective supervisors from the county or counties in the district, together with the appointive members appointed by the Soil and Water Conservation Commission pursuant to this section, and shall be known as the district board of supervisors. When a district is composed of less than four counties, the board of supervisors of each county shall on or before October 31, 1978, and on or before October 31 as the terms of the appointive supervisors expire, recommend in writing two persons from the district to the Commission to be appointed to serve with the elective supervisors. If the names are not submitted to the Commission as required, the office shall be deemed vacant on the date the term is set to expire and the Commission shall appoint two persons of the district to the district board of supervisors to serve with the elected supervisors. The Commission shall make its appointments prior to or at the November meeting of the Commission. Appointive supervisors shall take office on the first Monday in December following their appointment. Such appointive supervisors shall serve for a term of four years, and thereafter, as their terms expire, their successors shall serve for a term of four years. The terms of office of all appointive supervisors who have heretofore been lawfully appointed for terms the final year of which presently extends beyond the first Monday in December are hereby terminated on the first Monday in December of the final year of appointment. Vacancies for any reason in the appointive supervisors shall be filled for the unexpired term by the appointment of a person by the Commission from the district in which the vacancy occurs. Vacancies for any reason in the elected supervisors shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the Commission of a person from the county in the district in which the vacancy occurs.

In those districts composed of four or more counties, the Commission may, but is not required to, appoint two persons from the district without recommendation from the board of supervisors, to serve as district supervisors along with the elected members of the board of supervisors. Such appointments shall be made at the same time other appointments are made under this section, and the persons appointed shall serve for a term of four years.

The supervisors shall designate a chairman and may, from time to time, change such designation. A simple majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of transacting the business of the board, and approval by a majority of those present shall be adequate for a determination of any matter before the board, provided at least a quorum is present. Supervisors of soil and water conservation districts shall be compensated for their services at the per diem rate and allowed travel, subsistence and other expenses, as provided for State boards, commissions and committees generally, under the provisions of

G.S. 138-5

; provided, that when per diem compensation and travel, subsistence, or other expense is claimed by any supervisor for services performed outside the district for which such supervisor ordinarily may be appointed or elected to serve, the same may not be paid unless prior written approval is obtained from the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

The supervisors may employ a secretary, technical experts, whose qualifications shall be approved by the Department, and such other employees as they may require, and shall determine their qualifications, duties and compensation. The supervisors may call upon the Attorney General of the State for such legal services as they may require. The supervisors may delegate to their chairman, to one or more supervisors, or to one or more agents, or employees such powers and duties as they may deem proper. The supervisors shall furnish to the Soil and Water Conservation Commission, upon request, copies of such ordinances, rules, regulations, orders, contracts, forms, and other documents as they shall adopt or employ, and such other information concerning their activities as it may require in the performance of its duties under this Chapter.

The supervisors shall provide for the execution of surety bonds for all employees and officers who shall be entrusted with funds or property; shall provide for the keeping of a full and accurate record of all proceedings and of all resolutions, regulations, and orders issued or adopted; and shall provide for an annual audit of the accounts of receipts and disbursements. In any given year, if the supervisors provide for an internal audit, and the supervisor serving as chairman certifies, under oath, that this internal audit is a true and accurate reflection of the accounts of receipts and disbursements, then the supervisors shall not be required, notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 159-34

, to provide for an audit of the accounts of receipts and disbursements by a certified public accountant or by an accountant certified by the Local Government Commission. Any supervisor may be removed by the Soil and Water Conservation Commission upon notice and hearing, for neglect of duty, incompetence or malfeasance in office, but for no other reason.

The supervisors may invite the legislative body of any municipality or county located near the territory comprised within the district to designate a representative to advise and consult with the supervisors of the district on all questions of program and policy which may affect the property, water supply, or other interests of such municipality or county.

History.

1937, c. 393, s. 7; 1943, c. 481; 1947, c. 31, ss. 6, 7; 1957, c. 1374, s. 3; 1963, c. 563; 1973, c. 502, s. 2; c. 1262, s. 38; 1977, c. 387; c. 771, s. 4; 1979, c. 519, s. 2; 1981, c. 330; 1989, c. 66, s. 1; c. 727, s. 218(92); 1991, c. 689, s. 166; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2011-145, s. 13.22A(m).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.22A(m), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” at the end of the third paragraph; and deleted the former last paragraph.

§ 139-7.1.
Special revenue funds for the maintenance of conservation easements.

Establishing Fund. — The governing body of a soil and water conservation district may establish and maintain a special revenue fund for the purpose of maintaining conservation easements, including maintenance activities such as travel to and observation of easement property, remote monitoring of easement property, and education and ongoing communication with landowners about their easement responsibilities. To establish a special revenue fund under this section, the governing body of a soil and water conservation district shall adopt a resolution or ordinance that includes all of the following provisions:

The specific purposes of maintaining conservation easements for which the special revenue fund is created.

The approximate periods of time during which the moneys are to be accumulated for each purpose specified under subdivision (1) of this subsection.

The approximate amounts to be accumulated for each purpose specified under subdivision (1) of this subsection.

The sources from which moneys will be derived for each purpose specified under subdivision (1) of this subsection.

Changes Authorized. — The resolution or ordinance that establishes a special revenue fund under subsection (a) of this section may be amended from time to time in the same manner in which it was adopted. Such amendments may authorize the use of moneys in the special revenue fund for conservation easement maintenance purposes that are not previously provided for by resolution or ordinance.

Funding. — Any special revenue fund established under this section shall consist of funds received by appropriation from any other fund consistent with the limitations under G.S. 159-13(b); grant moneys; donations; direct appropriations from the State or any of its agencies or political subdivisions; or any other unrestricted funds appropriated to a soil and water conservation district from any source. When the conservation easement maintenance fund receives moneys or investment securities, the use of which is restricted by law, the identity of such moneys or investment securities shall be maintained by appropriate accounting entries.

Investment of Fund. — All or any part of the cash balances of a special revenue fund established under this section may be deposited at interest or invested as provided by

G.S. 159-30

.

Fund Withdrawals When District Adopts Its Own Budget Ordinance. — Withdrawals from a special revenue fund established under this section may be authorized by resolution or ordinance of the governing body of the soil and water conservation district. No withdrawal may be authorized unless it is for a purpose that is specified in the resolution or ordinance under subsection (a) of this section or in a resolution or ordinance under subsection (b) of this section. The resolution or ordinance to authorize a withdrawal under this subsection shall authorize an appropriation from the special revenue fund to one of the funds maintained pursuant to G.S. 159-13(a); however, no withdrawal may be authorized that would result in an appropriation for conservation easement maintenance purposes for which an adequate balance of eligible moneys or investment securities is not available in the special revenue fund at the time the resolution or ordinance under this subsection is adopted.

Fund Withdrawals When Other Body Adopts District’s Budget Ordinance. — If a soil and water conservation district’s budget ordinance is subject to adoption by another governing body, then the governing body that is responsible for adopting the soil and water district’s budget ordinance must approve the appropriation of moneys from the special revenue fund established under this section to one of the funds maintained pursuant to G.S. 159-13(a), subject to the other limitations provided in subsection (e) of this section.

History.

2011-209, s. 2.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2011-209, provides in its preamble: “Whereas, North Carolina is and always has been a leader in soil and water conservation, with the nation’s first soil and water conservation district established in Brown Creek, Anson County, under the leadership of Dr. Hugh Hammond Bennett, the ‘father of soil conservation’ in the United States; and

“Whereas, soil and water conservation districts continue into the 21st century to provide a critical voluntary, nonregulatory means to enhance conservation values of private lands, including much of the State’s agricultural and timber lands; and

“Whereas, conservation easements provide an increasingly important way that soil and water conservation districts, along with other units of State and local government and private land trusts, help private landowners conserve important soil and water resources on their property; and

“Whereas, to be effective in the long run, conservation easements require long-term or perpetual monitoring to assure that the intent of the easement donors and sellers is honored; and

“Whereas, soil and water conservation districts receive funds from diverse sources for long-term easement stewardship, including private contributions and donations, portions of transaction fees, donations from private charitable foundations, and contributions from and appropriation of public funds; and

“Whereas, the current local budgeting and finance laws do not adequately provide a means to ensure that these funds are dedicated to long-term or perpetual stewardship of conservation easements; Now, therefore,”

§ 139-7.2.
Training of elective and appointive district supervisors.

All district supervisors, whether elected or appointed, shall complete a minimum of six clock hours of training per term of service.

The training shall include soil, water, and natural resources conservation and the duties and responsibilities of district supervisors.

The training may be provided by the School of Government at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, or other qualified sources as approved by the Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

History.

2016-113, s. 5(b); 2018-113, s. 12.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-113, s. 12, effective June 27, 2018, substituted “per term of service” for “annually” in subsection (a).